Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2517
Native American Scholarship and Leadership Fund; created; use; investment.

The Native American Scholarship and Leadership Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Commission on Indian Affairs and shall consist of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 60-3,163.02. The commission shall use the fund to provide scholarships to Native Americans to attend a postsecondary educational institution in this state and to provide other leadership opportunities to Native Americans as determined by the commission. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2017, LB263, § 100;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 67.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.